Missouri, session 2026, SB1335.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 217, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 217.697, to read as
follows:
217.697. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, any offender who:
(1) Is incarcerated in a correctional facility after
being sentenced by a court of this state;
(2) Is sixty-five years of age or older; and
(3) Has no felony conviction for the offense of murder
in the first degree under section 565.020;
shall receive a parole hearing upon serving thirty years or
more of his or her sentence.
2. During the parole hearing required under subsection
1 of this section, the parole board shall determine whether
there is a reasonable probability the offender shall live
and remain at liberty without violating the law upon
release. If the board determines a reasonable probability
exists, the offender shall be eligible for release upon a
finding that the offender has:
(1) A record of good conduct while incarcerated;

SB 1335 2
(2) Demonstrated self-rehabilitation while
incarcerated;
(3) A workable parole plan, including community and
family support;
(4) An institutional risk factor score no higher than
one; and
(5) A mental health score of one, two, or three.
3. Any offender granted parole under this section
shall be subject to supervision by the division of probation
and parole upon release for a minimum of five years or until
the expiration of the offender's sentence, whichever occurs
earlier.
4. If the board does not grant parole to an offender
who qualifies for parole eligibility under subsection 1 of
this section, the offender shall be eligible for a parole
reconsideration hearing every two years until a presumptive
release date is established.
5. Nothing in this section shall diminish the
consideration of parole under any other provision of law
applicable to the offender or the responsibility and
authority of the governor to grant clemency, including
pardons and commutation of sentences if necessary or
desirable.
✓